California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all liens determined by the application of an ad valorem tax rate which were, at the time of declaration of default, included in the amount necessary to redeem the property under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4101) of Part 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

4671.3.

As used in this chapter, “assessments” includes all liens other than taxes which were, at the time of declaration of default, included in the amount necessary to redeem the property under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4101) of Part 7, and included in the amount necessary to redeem the property from sale to any taxing agency entitled to share in the proceeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.

(a) There shall be distributed to the State of California, to be placed in the General Fund, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for all or any portion of each separately valued parcel of real property that is both subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 and sold to private parties or to a taxing agency.

(b) The one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) required to be distributed, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be paid from the total proceeds of the sale. If the total amount of proceeds from the sale is insufficient, the one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 407, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.1.

(a) There shall be distributed to the county general fund to reimburse the county for the cost of conducting the sale, one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for all or any portion of each separately valued parcel of real property subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 and sold to private parties or to a taxing agency.

(b) The one hundred fifty dollars ($150) required to be distributed pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be paid from the total proceeds of the sale only after satisfaction of the amount specified in Section 4672. If the amount of proceeds from the sale is insufficient, the one hundred fifty dollars ($150) shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 407, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.2.

There shall be distributed to the county general fund any fee collected to reimburse the county for its actual and reasonable costs incurred in giving notice pursuant to Sections 3701 and 3799 for all or any portion of each separately valued parcel of real property subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 and sold to private parties or to taxing agencies. The notice fee for property sold shall be paid from the total amount to be distributed after satisfaction of the amounts specified in Sections 4672 and 4672.1. If the amount is insufficient, the notice fee shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 208, Sec. 3.   (AB 902)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.3.

(a) To reimburse the county for the costs of a personal contact, there shall be distributed to the tax collector a sum equal to the total amount of the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the tax collector in conducting the personal contact pursuant to Section 3704.7, for all or any portion of each separately valued parcel of real property subject to a power of sale and sold to private parties or a taxing agency.

(b) The amount of the costs shall be paid from the total amount to be distributed from the sold property, after satisfaction of the amount specified in Section 4672. If, after satisfaction of the amount specified in Section 4672, there is insufficient funds to pay the
 costs specified in subdivision (a), the costs shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 208, Sec. 4.   (AB 902)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4673.

Amounts to reimburse the county for the cost of advertising sales of tax-defaulted property shall be distributed to the county general fund as provided in Section 3719.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4673.1.

After satisfaction of the amount specified in Sections 4672, 4672.1, and 4673, the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:

(a) An amount of the proceeds up to but no greater than the amount required, at the time of sale, to redeem the property from tax default, the outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan, and the sale to any taxing agency entitled to share in the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:

(1) A pro rata share shall be distributed to each assessment fund in an amount bearing the same proportion as the assessment due each fund bears to the total amount of taxes and assessments necessary to redeem the
 property at the time of sale.

(2) After distributing the proceeds according to paragraph (1), a pro rata share shall be distributed to each tax fund in an amount bearing the same proportion to the balance remaining as the tax rate for each fund bears to the total tax rate applicable to the property for the fiscal year preceding that in which the property was sold.

(3) The remaining balance of the proceeds to be distributed under this section after distributing the proceeds according to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be distributed to the state controller for the outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan.

(b) After satisfaction of the amounts specified in subdivision (a), an amount of the proceeds necessary to satisfy current taxes and assessments and applicable penalties and costs thereon for the fiscal
 year in which the tax sale is held shall be distributed as provided in Chapter 1a (commencing with Section 4653) of this part. Current taxes and assessments referred to herein include taxes and assessments which would have been levied on the property if the property were not tax-deeded to any taxing agency and remains subject to sale by, or redemption from, the taxing agency.

(c) For purposes of this section, the “outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan” is the sum of the following:

(1) The tax payments made by the State Controller’s office on behalf of the claimant in the Property Tax Postponement Program.

(2) Accrued interest pursuant to Section 16183 of the Government Code, subject to Sections 20644 and 20644.5.

(3) Other associated
 fees and penalties as deemed appropriate by law.

(4) Less any payments already made on the property tax postponement loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 25.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4674.

Any excess in the proceeds deposited in the delinquent tax sale trust fund remaining after satisfaction of the amounts distributed under Sections 4672, 4672.1, 4672.2, 4673, and 4673.1 shall be retained in the fund on account of, and may be claimed by parties of interest in the property as provided in, Section 4675. At the expiration of the period specified in subdivision (e) of Section 4675, any excess proceeds not claimed under Section 4675 may be transferred to the county general fund of the county by the county auditor, except that prior to the transfer, the county may deduct those costs of maintaining the redemption and tax-defaulted property files, and those costs of administering and processing the claims for excess proceeds, that have not been recovered under any other
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4675.

(a) (1) Any party of interest in the property may file with the county a claim for the excess proceeds, in proportion to that person’s interest held with others of equal priority in the property at the time of sale, at any time prior to the expiration of one year following the recordation of the tax collector’s deed to the purchaser.

(2) The claim shall be postmarked on or before the one-year expiration date to be considered timely. The claim shall be deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed with the required postage, or deposited for shipment, with an independent delivery service that is an Internal Revenue Service designated delivery service or that has been approved by the tax collector, in a sealed
 envelope or package, properly addressed with the required fee prepaid. The claim shall be deemed received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope containing the claim, or on the independent delivery service shipment date shown on the packing slip or air bill attached to the outside of the envelope or package containing the claim. If a claim deposited in the United States mail does not contain an official postmark, the date of filing shall be the date received by the county treasurer-tax collector’s office.

(b) After the property has been sold, a party of interest in the property at the time of the sale may assign their right to claim the excess proceeds only by a dated, written instrument that explicitly states that the right to claim the excess proceeds is being assigned, and only after each party to the proposed assignment has disclosed to each other party to the proposed assignment all facts of which
 that party is aware relating to the value of the right that is being assigned. Any attempted assignment that does not comply with these requirements shall have no effect. This subdivision applies only with respect to assignments on or after the effective date of this subdivision.

(c) Any person or entity who in any way acts on behalf of, or in place of, any party of interest with respect to filing a claim for any excess proceeds shall submit proof with the claim that the amount and source of excess proceeds have been disclosed to the party of interest and that the party of interest has been advised of their right to file a claim for the excess proceeds on their own behalf directly with the county at no cost.

(d) The claims shall contain any information and proof deemed necessary by the board of supervisors to establish the claimant’s rights to all or any portion of the excess
 proceeds.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no sooner than one year following the recordation of the tax collector’s deed to the purchaser, and if the excess proceeds have been claimed by any party of interest as provided herein, the excess proceeds shall be distributed on order of the board of supervisors to the parties of interest who have claimed the excess proceeds in the order of priority set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b). For the purposes of this article, parties of interest and their order of priority are:

(A) First, lienholders of record prior to the recordation of the tax deed to the purchaser in the order of their priority.

(B) Second, any person with title of record to all or any portion of the property prior to the recordation of the tax deed to the purchaser.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the board of supervisors has been petitioned to rescind the tax sale pursuant to Section 3731, any excess proceeds shall not be distributed to the parties of interest as provided by paragraph (1) sooner than one year following the date the board of supervisors determines the tax sale should not be rescinded, and only if the person who petitioned the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 3731 has not commenced a proceeding in court pursuant to Section 3725.

(B) If a proceeding has been commenced in a court pursuant to Section 3725, any excess proceeds shall not be distributed to the parties of interest as provided by paragraph (1) until a final court order is issued.

(f) In the event that a person with title of record is deceased at the time of the
 distribution of the excess proceeds, the heirs may submit an affidavit pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code, to support their claim for excess proceeds.

(g) Any action or proceeding to review the decision of the board of supervisors, or the county officer to whom the board delegated authority pursuant to Section 4675.1, to accept or deny the claim shall be commenced within 90 days after the date of that decision of the board of supervisors or the county officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 123, Sec. 2.   (AB 3288)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4675.1.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by resolution, authorize any county officers to perform on its behalf any act required or authorized to be performed by the board of supervisors under Section 4675.

The resolution shall enumerate the section, or those portions of the section, to which the authorization is to apply, and shall specify administrative rules and procedures concerning any act performed under the authorization.

The resolution shall require that the county auditor record each act performed under the authorization.

The resolution may provide for review by the board of supervisors of any act performed under the authorization, or for periodic reports to the board of supervisors of any or all acts performed under the authorization, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

4676.

(a) When excess proceeds from the sale of tax-defaulted property exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the county shall provide notice of the right to claim the excess proceeds, as provided in this section.

(b) No later than 90 days after the sale of the property, the county shall mail written notice of the right to claim excess proceeds to the last known mailing address of parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675. The county shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest.

(c) If the last known address of a party of interest cannot be obtained, the county
 shall publish notice of the right to claim excess proceeds in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Publication is not required if the cost to publish is equal to or greater than the amount of the excess proceeds. The notice shall be published once a week for three successive weeks and shall commence no later than 90 days after the sale of the property.

(d) The cost of obtaining the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest and of mailing or publishing the notices required under this section shall be deducted from the excess proceeds and shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 352, Sec. 7.   (SB 948)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Alternative Method of Distribution of Tax Levies and Collections and of Tax Sale Proceeds [4701. - 4717.]

4701.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the purpose of this chapter to provide an alternative procedure for the distribution of property tax levies on the secured roll made by counties on their own behalf or as the tax-levying and tax-collecting agency for other political subdivisions. The Legislature further finds and declares that the object of this alternative procedure is to simplify the tax-levying and tax-apportioning process and to increase flexibility in the use of available cash resources.

(b) For purposes of this chapter only, the term “secured roll” may include the supplemental property tax roll as described in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.

(a) The procedure authorized by this chapter may be placed in effect in any county by resolution of the board of supervisors of that county adopted not later than July 15th of the fiscal year for which it is to first apply and shall thereafter remain in effect unless the board orders its discontinuance or unless, prior to the commencement of any subsequent fiscal year, the board receives a petition for its discontinuance joined in by resolutions duly adopted by the governing boards of not less than two-thirds of the participating revenue districts in the county, in which event the board shall order discontinuance of the procedure effective at the commencement of the subsequent fiscal year.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for the 1993–94 and 1994–95 fiscal years only, the procedure authorized by this chapter may be placed in effect in any county by resolution of the board of supervisors of that county adopted not later than October 15 of the relevant fiscal year, and shall remain in effect unless otherwise discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1166, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.5.

In any county electing to follow the procedure authorized by this chapter the board of supervisors by resolution as specified in Section 4702 may extend, or discontinue, these procedures to assessments that are entered on the secured tax roll for the current year.

Upon adoption, assessments shall be apportioned in the same manner that taxes are apportioned under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

4702.7.

In any county electing to follow the procedure authorized by this chapter, the board of supervisors, by resolution adopted in accordance with Section 4702, after holding a public hearing on the matter, may discontinue those procedures with respect to any tax levying agency or assessment levying agency in the county if the rate of secured tax delinquency in that agency in any year exceeds 3 percent of the total of all taxes and assessments levied on the secured rolls in that agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 130, Sec. 3.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.

In each county that elects to adopt the procedure authorized by this chapter there is hereby created a tax losses reserve fund.

(a) The tax losses reserve fund shall be used exclusively, as hereinafter provided, to cover losses that may occur in the amount of tax liens as a result of special sales of tax-defaulted property. Whenever in any year the amount of the tax losses reserve fund has reached an amount equivalent to 1 percent of the total of all taxes and assessments levied on the secured roll for that year for participating entities in the county, the amounts hereinafter authorized to be credited to that fund may, for the remainder of that year, be credited to the county general fund.

(b) The auditor and treasurer shall keep apportioned tax resources accounts in a manner that the balance of amounts apportioned to funds on an accrual basis shall be known by both officers. In addition, the auditor shall keep secured taxes receivable accounts in a manner as to establish accountability for the amounts receivable on the secured tax rolls. Secured tax rolls, as used in this chapter, include delinquent rolls prescribed by Section 2627.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 914, Sec. 5.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.2.

(a) In any county electing to follow the procedure authorized by this chapter, the board of supervisors may, by October 31 of any fiscal year, on the recommendation of the county auditor, adopt a resolution electing to be governed by this section rather than the provisions of Section 4703. Upon adoption, a copy of this resolution shall be filed with the county auditor, the county treasurer, and the county tax collector. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, this election shall remain in effect each fiscal year unless the board of supervisors adopts another resolution by October 31 of a fiscal year electing to be governed instead by Section 4703. For the 1993–94 fiscal year only, the election to be governed by this section rather than Section 4703 may be made no later than January 15, 1994. For the 1994–95 fiscal year only, an election to be governed by this section rather than Section 4703 may be rescinded, upon the recommendation of the county auditor, by a resolution electing governance under Section 4703 that is adopted by the board of supervisors on any date during that fiscal year.

(b) In each county that elects to adopt the procedure authorized by this chapter and elects to be governed by this section rather than Section 4703 there shall be created a tax losses reserve fund.

(c) The tax losses reserve fund shall be used exclusively, as hereinafter provided, to cover losses that may occur in the amount of tax liens as a result of special sales of tax-defaulted property. In a county electing to be subject to this section rather than Section 4703, the tax losses reserve fund shall be maintained at not less than 25 percent of the total delinquent secured taxes and assessments for participating entities in the county as calculated at the end of the fiscal year. At the end of the fiscal year, amounts in the tax losses reserve fund that are in excess of 25 percent of the total delinquent secured taxes and assessments for participating entities in the county may be credited to the county general fund.

(d) The auditor and treasurer shall keep apportioned tax resources accounts in such a manner that the balance of amounts apportioned to funds on an accrual basis shall be known by both officers. In addition, the auditor shall keep secured taxes receivable accounts in such a manner as to establish accountability for the amounts receivable on the secured tax rolls. Secured tax rolls as used in this chapter include delinquent rolls prescribed by Section 2627.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4703.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, general, special, or local, if Orange County sells or assigns obligations arising out of delinquent assessments or taxes on the secured roll to a joint powers agency pursuant to Section 26220.5 of the Government Code, the Orange County Board of Supervisors may elect to transfer its tax losses reserve fund to the joint powers agency. The tax losses reserve fund shall be maintained by the joint powers agency according to Section 4703 or 4703.2, whichever is applicable, except that the tax losses reserve fund may both be used to cover losses that may occur in the amount of tax liens as a result of special sales of tax-defaulted property and, subject to agreements with bondholders, be pledged as a reserve for bonds issued by the joint powers agency to purchase the obligations arising out of delinquent assessments or taxes on the secured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 613.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4704.

In order to facilitate tax accounting in connection with the procedure authorized by this chapter each county which adopts the procedure shall enter tax-defaulted property on the rolls in the name of the assessee and extend taxes thereon in the name of the assessee. The amount so extended shall be used in the determination of the cost to redeem that property. If valuations of tax-defaulted property entered on the roll under the provisions of this section exceed 1 percent of the total, the valuations shall not be included by the county auditor in any statement of equalized assessed valuations which he or she may be required to make as the basis for the determination of a bond debt limitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

4705.

(a) Upon completion of the tax roll as prescribed by Section 2152, the county auditor shall determine the total amount of taxes actually extended thereon for each fund for which a tax levy has been included. The amount so determined for each fund shall forthwith be apportioned to the credit of those funds on the accounts of the county auditor and county treasurer and the total thereof shall be entered on the apportioned tax resources accounts of both officers.

(b) Assessments entered on the secured tax roll shall be apportioned in the same manner if the board of supervisors has extended these procedures to assessments under Section 4702.5.

(c) Upon completion of the tax roll the auditor shall record the total amount due on the secured taxes receivable accounts.

(d) The board of supervisors shall provide which moneys in the county treasury, including but not limited to those credited to the tax losses reserve, shall be available to be drawn on to the extent of the amount of uncollected taxes credited to each fund for which a tax levy has been included, and those moneys may thereafter be drawn against in an amount not to exceed the amount of uncollected taxes credited to each fund for which a tax levy has been included in the same manner as if the amount credited had been collected. To the extent that moneys are so expended for a fund in advance of receipt of tax revenue therefor, the tax revenue may not be expended upon receipt. Moneys in the amount credited to the tax losses reserve, as well as tax revenues actually received for funds to the extent moneys have been expended therefor in advance of receipt, shall be available in the county treasury for payment for the same purposes and in the same amounts as the money advance was available prior to being advanced; provided however, that if the moneys so advanced were derived from the proceeds of the sale of bonds, including notes, certificates of participation, or other instruments evidencing indebtedness, authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) or otherwise permitted by law, or the investment of those amounts, then tax revenues actually received, including delinquent penalties, shall be used for the repayment of the bonds or the replenishment of any reserve fund for these bonds, or both.

(e) Any county that has elected to adopt the procedure authorized by this chapter is hereby authorized, in addition to any other financing permitted by law, to fund the procedure by the issuance of bonds payable from any delinquent taxes, assessments, and delinquent penalties in accordance with Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Once the procedure authorized by this chapter is adopted, the obligation of the county to fund the procedure is an obligation imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4706.

Upon completion of the computation of delinquent penalties on unpaid first installments as prescribed by Section 2617 of this code the auditor shall record the additional amount due on the secured taxes receivable accounts. The auditor shall similarly record the accountability for delinquent penalties and costs computed and entered on unpaid second installments as prescribed by Section 2627 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

4707.

Should any tax or assessment which was apportioned at the time of levy be changed by correction, cancellation or refund authorized by Part 9 of Division 1 of this code, a pro rata adjustment for the amount of such change shall be made in each of the funds to which apportionment previously has been made. The total pro rata adjustments of amounts previously apportioned shall be entered on the apportioned tax resources accounts of the auditor and the treasurer. The total amount of the changes shall be entered on the secured taxes receivable accounts of the auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

4708.

Amounts received on the secured tax roll for the current year shall be distributed on the accounts of the auditor and treasurer as follows:

(a) Any amounts levied but not apportioned to funds in the manner authorized by this chapter shall be distributed to the funds for which levied as prescribed in Chapter 1a of this part.

(b) Any amounts which were apportioned to funds at the time of the levy in the manner authorized by this chapter shall be distributed to the apportioned tax resources accounts.

(c) Amounts collected as costs shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(d) Amounts collected as delinquent penalties shall be distributed to the tax losses reserve fund.

The auditor shall record the total secured tax roll collections on his secured taxes receivable accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

4709.

Upon completion of the delinquent roll as prescribed by Section 2627, the auditor shall verify the total thereof against his or her accounts. The auditor shall similarly verify against his or her accounts the total of the list of tax-defaulted property furnished him or her after the declaration date by the tax collector as prescribed by Section 3442.

The auditor shall adjust the secured taxes receivable accounts for the total amount of any adjustments on the secured tax rolls for delinquent penalties and costs which are no longer receivable as of the sale date under Section 4102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.

After apportionment to the state of the amounts prescribed by Section 4656.5, amounts received for the redemption of tax-defaulted property shall be distributed as follows:

(a) Any amounts levied but not apportioned to funds at the time of levy in the manner authorized by this chapter and any redemption penalties collected on those amounts shall be distributed to funds as prescribed in Chapter 1c (commencing with Section 4656), except that assessments not apportioned previously shall be distributed to the funds for which levied.

(b) Any amounts which were apportioned to funds at the time of the levy in the manner authorized by this chapter shall be distributed to the apportioned tax resources accounts. The pro rata of redemption penalties or interest collected on any amounts levied but not apportioned to funds at the time of levy shall be distributed to the respective funds and the balance of redemption penalties or interest together with delinquency penalties shall be apportioned to the tax losses reserve fund.

(c) Amounts collected as costs shall be distributed to a restricted county fund to be allocated only for the following purposes:

(1) Updating and improving information with respect to delinquent taxes.

(2) Redemption systems.

(3) Monthly settlements with the auditor pursuant to Section 4108.

(4) The collection of taxes by the tax collector.

The total amount collected on the secured tax roll shall be entered on the secured taxes receivable accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 527, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4711.

The proceeds of the sale of tax-defaulted property deposited in the delinquent tax sale trust fund shall be distributed as provided in Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671). However, the taxes and assessments which constitute the amounts required to redeem the tax-defaulted property shall, for the purposes of this chapter, be distributed as follows:

(a) The amount available for distribution shall be prorated on the basis of those taxes and assessments between apportioned levies and unapportioned levies. 

(b) The pro rata share for unapportioned levies shall be prorated between the amount of tax levies and the amount of assessment levies. The pro rata share for unapportioned tax levies shall be distributed to funds on the basis prescribed in Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671). The pro rata share for unapportioned assessment levies shall be distributed to the assessment funds on the basis prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 4710.

(c) The pro rata share for apportioned levies shall be distributed to the tax losses reserve fund.

The amount canceled by the sale shall be entered on the secured taxes receivable accounts. Any canceled amounts which were apportioned at the time of levy in the manner authorized by this chapter shall be entered on the apportioned tax resources accounts, and this cancellation shall be borne by the tax losses reserve fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 77.)
-------------------------------------------

4713.

In any county electing to follow the procedure authorized by this chapter the tax collector and auditor, or either of them, upon approval of the county treasurer, may determine by analysis of the abstract of delinquencies the amounts included therein by the original tax and assessment levies for each fund, and, on the basis of such determination, the treasurer and auditor may forthwith enter the total tax levy on the apportioned tax resources accounts and apportion to each fund for which taxes were levied 95 percent of the fund amounts so determined. The remaining 5 percent of the tax amounts shall be apportioned to the tax losses reserve fund. These apportionments shall constitute a full liquidation of the share of each fund in the liens for delinquent taxes appearing on the abstract list and any amounts thereafter received through redemption or sale of the property shall be apportioned in the manner prescribed by Sections 4708, 4710, and 4711 for years in which the procedure authorized by this chapter has been in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

4713.5.

In any county electing under both Sections 4702 and 4702.5 to follow the procedures authorized by this chapter the tax collector and auditor, or either of them, upon the approval of the county treasurer may apportion assessment levies in the same manner that Section 4713 provides for tax levies except that each fund for which assessments were levied shall be apportioned 100 percent of the assessment levies so determined. Such apportionments shall constitute a full liquidation of the share of each fund in the liens for delinquent assessments appearing on the abstract list and any amounts thereafter received through redemption, sale or rental of the property shall be apportioned in the manner prescribed by Sections 4708, 4710, 4711 and 4712 for years in which the procedure authorized by this chapter has been in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

4714.

Taxing agencies for which the county levies and collects taxes but for which the county treasury is not the legal depositary may be limited in their withdrawals from the county treasury to amounts proportionate with actual tax collections by the county within their taxing areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1370.)
-------------------------------------------

4715.

This chapter shall have no application to tax levies made by counties on behalf of public districts for which the county treasury is not the legal depositary unless agreed to by a resolution of the governing board of the public district and the board of supervisors of the county, adopted in accordance with Section 4702 for the fiscal year in which this procedure is to apply to that public district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 130, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4716.

There shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, be distributed to each fund not less than the amount which must under the Constitution be distributed thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1370.)
-------------------------------------------

4717.

(a) If a tax payment which is insufficient to cover the amount of taxes due and payable is received by the tax collector of a county that has elected to follow the procedure authorized by this chapter, the tax collector shall place the tax payment in a trust fund and immediately notify the taxpayer of the deficiency.

(b) In the case of a deficiency in the payment of secured taxes, the taxpayer may pay the balance due until the date on which the property becomes tax defaulted by operation of law. If payment of the balance due is not received on or before that date, the insufficient payment shall be returned to the taxpayer, and shall become tax defaulted in the usual manner as provided in this code.

(c) In the case of a deficiency in the payment of unsecured taxes, the taxpayer may pay the balance due within six months after the date of the insufficient payment. If payment of the balance due is not made within that time, the tax collector or other officer collecting unsecured taxes shall credit the amount of the insufficient payment on the unsecured roll.

(d) If payment of the balance due is made within the time specified in this section, any delinquent penalty which attaches by operation of law shall be computed only upon the additional amount required to bring the payment to a nondelinquent status.

(e) The county auditor shall make the necessary adjustments in the tax rolls and in the tax and penalty charges.

(f) The tax collector may accept
 payments which are within twenty dollars ($20) of the tax due as payment in full. The auditor or controller shall prescribe methods for accounting and adjusting their accounts in this matter.

(g) The provisions of this section shall become effective in any county when authorized by resolution adopted by majority vote of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 258, Sec. 5.   (SB 789)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. CORRECTIONS, CANCELLATIONS, AND REFUNDS [4801. - 5170.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4801. - 4808.]

4801.

As used in this part, “taxes” includes assessments collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

As used in this part, “district attorney” means the civil legal adviser of the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by resolution, authorize the county administrative officer, or the county legal advisor, or the county auditor, or any other county officer, or a specified group of any county officers acting as a committee, to perform in its behalf any act required or authorized to be performed by the board of supervisors under this part, if such act is not imposed upon the board of supervisors by the Constitution.

The resolution may, at the request of the county legal advisor, provide for a waiver of the requirement for the written consent of the county legal advisor in any act performed under the provisions of this section.

The resolution shall enumerate those sections or subdivisions, or those portions of sections or subdivisions, to which the authorization is to apply, and shall specify administrative rules and procedures concerning any act performed under the authorization.

The resolution shall require that the county auditor record each act performed under the authorization.

The resolution may provide for review by the board of supervisors of any act performed under the authorization, or for periodic reports to the board of supervisors of any or all acts performed under the authorization, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.
